Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1249
Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under sections 43-1248 to 43-1264 a court of this state may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were a child custody determination.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 24.